Hawaii statutes.
[§621-10.5] Unlawful suspension or
discharge from employment; penalty; right of action. (a) An employer
shall not deprive an employee of the employee's employment, or threaten or
otherwise coerce the employee with respect thereto, because the employee receives
a summons, responds thereto, serves as a witness or attends court as a
prospective witness.

(b) Any employer who violates subsection (a)
is guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

(c) If an employer discharges or suspends an
employee in violation of subsection (a) the employee within ninety days from
the date of discharge or suspension may bring a civil action for recovery of
wages lost as a result of the violation and for an order requiring the
reinstatement of the employee. Damages recoverable shall not exceed lost wages
for six weeks. If the employee prevails, the employee shall be allowed a
reasonable attorney's fee fixed by the court. [L 1978, c 13, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next